dev/nouns.chopped.dix
    <pardef n="sve/ce__n_f">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ces</l>
          <r>ce<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>cei</l>
          <r>ce<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ci</l>
          <r>ce<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>cē</l>
          <r>ce<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ci</l>
          <r>ce<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ce</l>
          <r>ce<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ces</l>
          <r>ce<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ce</l>
          <r>ce<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ču</l>
          <r>ce<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>cēm</l>
          <r>ce<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ces</l>
          <r>ce<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>cēs</l>
          <r>ce<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>cēm</l>
          <r>ce<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ces</l>
          <r>ce<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>cēm</l>
          <r>ce<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ces</l>
          <r>ce<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="šah/s__n_m">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>s<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>am</l>
          <r>s<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>u</l>
          <r>s<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ā</l>
          <r>s<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>u</l>
          <r>s<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>s</l>
          <r>s<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>s<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>s</l>
          <r>s<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="Kaukāz/s__n_m">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>s<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>am</l>
          <r>s<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>u</l>
          <r>s<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ā</l>
          <r>s<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>u</l>
          <r>s<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r>s<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>s<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>s</l>
          <r>s<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="vid/us__n_m">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>us</l>
          <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>um</l>
          <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>u</l>
          <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ū</l>
          <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>u</l>
          <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>u</l>
          <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>us</l>
          <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>us</l>
          <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="htm__n_f">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="alumīnijs"><i>alumīnij</i><par n="šah/s__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="atsauce"><i>atsau</i><par n="sve/ce__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="augstfrekvence"><i>augstfrekven</i><par n="sve/ce__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="baroks"><i>barok</i><par n="šah/s__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="basketbols"><i>basketbol</i><par n="šah/s__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="beta"><i>beta</i><par n="htm__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="betons"><i>beton</i><par n="šah/s__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="budisms"><i>budism</i><par n="šah/s__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="dzīvsudrabs"><i>dzīvsudrab</i><par n="šah/s__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="eksports"><i>eksport</i><par n="šah/s__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="frekvence"><i>frekven</i><par n="sve/ce__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="futbols"><i>futbol</i><par n="šah/s__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="hēlijs"><i>hēlij</i><par n="šah/s__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="htm"><i>htm</i><par n="htm__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="html"><i>html</i><par n="htm__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="ierīce"><i>ierī</i><par n="sve/ce__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="islāms"><i>islām</i><par n="šah/s__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="jūdaisms"><i>jūdaism</i><par n="šah/s__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="kalcijs"><i>kalcij</i><par n="šah/s__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="klasicisms"><i>klasicism</i><par n="šah/s__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="konference"><i>konferen</i><par n="sve/ce__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="kosmoss"><i>kosmos</i><par n="šah/s__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="kvarcs"><i>kvarc</i><par n="šah/s__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="lodveids"><i>lodveid</i><par n="šah/s__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="medus"><i>med</i><par n="vid/us__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="miers"><i>mier</i><par n="šah/s__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="militārisms"><i>militārism</i><par n="šah/s__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="nātrijs"><i>nātrij</i><par n="šah/s__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="pārsvars"><i>pārsvar</i><par n="šah/s__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="pasts"><i>past</i><par n="šah/s__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="piens"><i>pien</i><par n="šah/s__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="prece"><i>pre</i><par n="sve/ce__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="province"><i>provin</i><par n="sve/ce__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="rezidence"><i>reziden</i><par n="sve/ce__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="romantisms"><i>romantism</i><par n="šah/s__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="šahs"><i>šah</i><par n="šah/s__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="sapulce"><i>sapul</i><par n="sve/ce__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="svece"><i>sve</i><par n="sve/ce__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="svins"><i>svin</i><par n="šah/s__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="tendence"><i>tenden</i><par n="sve/ce__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="teniss"><i>tenis</i><par n="šah/s__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="tērauds"><i>tēraud</i><par n="šah/s__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="tūrisms"><i>tūrism</i><par n="šah/s__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="urāns"><i>urān</i><par n="šah/s__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="uzturs"><i>uztur</i><par n="šah/s__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="vairākums"><i>vairākum</i><par n="šah/s__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="vakuums"><i>vakuum</i><par n="šah/s__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="vidus"><i>vid</i><par n="vid/us__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="visums"><i>visum</i><par n="šah/s__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="zemestrīce"><i>zemestrī</i><par n="sve/ce__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="Āgenskalns"><i>Āgenskaln</i><par n="šah/s__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="Anatolijs"><i>Anatolij</i><par n="šah/s__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="Jēzus"><i>Jēz</i><par n="vid/us__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="Jupiters"><i>Jupiter</i><par n="šah/s__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="Kaukāzs"><i>Kaukāz</i><par n="Kaukāz/s__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="Ķegums"><i>Ķegum</i><par n="šah/s__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="Ļeņins"><i>Ļeņin</i><par n="šah/s__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="Marss"><i>Mars</i><par n="šah/s__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="Mozus"><i>Moz</i><par n="vid/us__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="Muhameds"><i>Muhamed</i><par n="Kaukāz/s__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="Ņūtons"><i>Ņūton</i><par n="šah/s__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="Sanfrancisko"><i>Sanfrancisko</i><par n="htm__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="Staļins"><i>Staļin</i><par n="šah/s__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="Tartu"><i>Tartu</i><par n="htm__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="Tukums"><i>Tukum</i><par n="šah/s__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="Zālamans"><i>Zālaman</i><par n="šah/s__n_m"/></e>
